Tennessee, session 114, SB2637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-1103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) An individual shall not serve as a teacher or assistant teacher in a child care
program for children who are four (4) years of age or younger unless the teacher or
assistant teacher is at least eighteen (18) years of age.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2637
010353
- 1 -